Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.270

Appointment of guardian ad litem for minors, alleged incapacitated persons—Protection of interests.

When it appears in any petition or otherwise at any time during the proceedings for condemnation brought pursuant to chapters 8.04, 8.08, 8.12, 8.16, 8.20, and 8.24 RCW that any minor, or alleged incapacitated person is interested in any property that is to be taken or damaged, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor or alleged incapacitated person to appear and assist in the person's defense, unless a guardian or limited guardian has previously been appointed, in which case the duty to appear and assist shall be delegated to the properly qualified guardian or limited guardian. The court shall make such orders or decrees as it shall deem necessary to protect and secure the interest of the minor or alleged incapacitated person.

[ 1996 c 249 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—1996 c 249: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.